Wyoming, session 2025, HB0183.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 37-16-101(a)(intro), (viii)(B) and by
creating a new paragraph (ix) and 37-16-102 by creating new
paragraphs (iv) and (v) are amended to read:

37-16-101. Definitions.

HB0183

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0548
(a) As used in this chapter, unless the context or a
specific article otherwise requires:

(viii) "Net metering system" means a facility
for the production of electrical energy that:

(B) Has a generating capacity of not more
than:

(I) Twenty-five (25) kilowatts per
meter for residential use;

(II) Two hundred (200) kilowatts per
meter for nonresidential use.

(ix) "Primary feeder" means a power line or
other facility that carries electricity directly from a
substation to distribution transformers.

37-16-102. Electric utility requirements.

(a) An electric utility:

HB0183

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0548
(iv) Shall, upon request from a
customer-generator, aggregate an additional meter that is
physically attached to the net metering system with one (1)
or more designated meters, if:

(A) The additional meter is located on the
customer-generator's premises;

(B) The electricity is for the
customer-generator's use;

(C) The designated meter and the additional
meter are subject to the same rate schedule; and

(D) The designated meter and the additional
meter are served by the same primary feeder.

(v) Shall, not later than July 1, 2026 and each
July 1 thereafter, report to the commission on the total
installed kilowatt capacity of net metering systems within
the electric utility's Wyoming service territory and the
peak electric demand for the electric utility. When annual
total capacity of net metering systems in Wyoming reaches
HB0183

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0548
five percent (5%) of any one (1) electric utility's total
peak demand, the commission shall forward all reports
received under this paragraph to the joint corporations,
elections and political subdivisions interim committee not
later than November 1 of the same year.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0183